Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.13
Examining board; license; issuance; replacement license, when; fee.

The examining board may issue a license or an in-training certificate to a qualified person. A new license may be issued to replace a lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated license, subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the examining board. A fee not to exceed fifty dollars shall be charged the applicant for the issuance of a replacement license.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 26.
September 1, 2024